Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.070

Terms and conditions may be imposed.

Upon the granting or continuing an injunction, such terms and conditions may be imposed upon the party obtaining it as may be deemed equitable.

[Code 1881 s 158; 1877 p 33 s 158; 1869 p 39 s 156; 1854 p 153 s 116; RRS s 724.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 65(d).